Utah statutes.
7-9-28.   Loan to credit union official.

 The board of directors shall review and either approve or deny a loan application on which a member of the board of directors, credit committee, supervisory committee, president, or credit manager is a direct obligor, or endorser, cosigner, or guarantor.	



Amended by Chapter 182, 1996 General Session

